Missouri, session 2026, SB1630.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 192, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 192.037, to read as
follows:
192.037. 1. The department of health and senior
services shall designate noncommunicable diseases that are
of public health concern and enforce adequate orders,
findings, rules, and regulations to prevent the spread of
such diseases and to determine the prevalence of such
diseases within the state.
2. The department of health and senior services shall
include in its list of noncommunicable diseases that are
required to be reported to the department alpha-gal syndrome
and Lyme disease.
3. Any required noncommunicable disease case report
shall be submitted to the department within seven days of
receiving a positive laboratory confirmation. The person or
entity responsible for submitting the report shall be:
(1) For any case other than a case of alpha-gal
syndrome, the health care provider treating the patient; and

SB 1630 2
(2) For any case of alpha-gal syndrome, the laboratory
that finalizes the positive test result.
4. A report of alpha-gal syndrome shall be required
for an alpha-gal immunoglobulin E level of greater than or
equal to one-tenth of one international unit per milliliter
or greater than or equal to one-tenth of one kilounit per
liter. A laboratory that finalizes such a test result shall
report the test result as a case of alpha-gal syndrome using
an electronic laboratory reporting system to be developed by
the department.
5. The department of health and senior services shall
follow up on reported cases of alpha-gal syndrome by
applying an appropriate random sampling method for
confirmation that the cases meet the most current Centers
for Disease Control and Prevention surveillance case
definition of alpha-gal syndrome.
6. The department of health and senior services shall
submit an annual report to the Centers for Disease Control
and Prevention summarizing its findings related to the
reporting and incidence of the diseases included in the list
described in subsection 2 of this section.
7. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking

SB 1630 3
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓